North Carolina, session 2025, HB354.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 1A-1, Rule 17 of the Rules of Civil Procedure, is amended by
adding a new subsection to read:
"(f) Gatekeeper Order. – A person who has been adjudicated incompetent and has been
prohibited from filing pleadings in court may file a pleading with the court only through the
person's guardian or counsel. If a person has been identified by the Administrative Office of the
Courts as having been so adjudicated, then the court shall strike any pleading filed by the person
during the person's adjudicated incompetency and not filed by the person's guardian or counsel
and issue a gatekeeper order to prevent the person from executing filings in violation of this
subsection. A gatekeeper order entered under this subsection shall be served on the person's
guardian and counsel. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person who has been adjudicated
incompetent from filing any pleading without the assistance of that person's guardian or counsel
in any of the following: (i) an action against that person's guardian or counsel, (ii) an action
appealing the determination of being adjudicated incompetent, (iii) an action petitioning for
modification of guardianship, (iv) an action to restore the person's competency, and (v) an action
in which the person who has been adjudicated incompetent is sued. The court shall withdraw the
gatekeeper order and allow the person to file pleadings with a court if the person's competency
has been restored."
SECTION 2. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a functional
database of all persons currently adjudicated as incompetent by a North Carolina court as
described in Section 1 of this act. The database must be updated when a person has been
adjudicated incompetent, when a guardianship has been modified, and when a person's
competency has been restored. The database must be readily accessible to judges and the clerks
of superior court.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to actions
and proceedings brought or pending on or after that date.
*H354-v-3*